hr-HR: Materijal rezonatorske cijevi vibrafona: Aluminij; Mjed; Čelik; Ostalo
de: Material der Vibraphon-Resonatorrohre: Aluminium; Messing; Stahl; Sonstiges
en: Vibraphone resonator tube material: Aluminum; Brass; Steel; Other
cs: Materiál rezonančních trubic vibrafonu: Hliník; Mosaz; Ocel; Jiné
nb: Materiale for vibrafonresonatorrør: Aluminium; Messing; Stål; Annet
lt-LT: Vibrafono rezonatorių vamzdžių medžiaga: Aliuminis; Žalvaris; Plienas; Kita
ja: ビブラフォン共鳴管素材: アルミニウム; 真鍮; スチール; その他
nl: Vibrafoon resonatorbuis materiaal: Aluminium; Messing; Staal; Overige
pt-PT: Material dos tubos ressonadores do vibrafone: Alumínio; Latão; Aço; Outro
bg-BG: Материал на резонаторните тръби на вибрафона: Алуминий; Месинг; Стомана; Друго
zh-CN: 颤音琴共鸣管材料: 铝; 黄铜; 钢; 其他
sv: Material i vibrafonresonatorrör: Aluminium; Mässing; Stål; Övrigt
vi: Vật liệu ống cộng hưởng đàn vibraphone: Nhôm; Đồng thau; Thép; Khác
ko: 비브라폰 공명관 소재: 알루미늄; 황동; 강철; 기타
da: Materiale i resonatorrør til vibrafon: Aluminium; Messing; Stål; Andet
zh-TW: 電鐵琴共鳴管材質: 鋁; 黃銅; 鋼; 其他
fr: Matériau des tubes résonateurs du vibraphone: Aluminium; Laiton; Acier; Autre
sk-SK: Materiál duše rezonančného vibrafónu: Hliník; Mosadz; Oceľ; Iné
fi: Vibrafonin resonaattoriputkien materiaali: Alumiini; Messinki; Teräs; Muu
tr: Vibrafon rezonatör borusu malzemesi: Alüminyum; Pirinç; Çelik; Diğer
th: วัสดุท่อเรโซเนเตอร์ของไวบราโฟน: อะลูมิเนียม; ทองเหลือง; เหล็ก; อื่นๆ
es: Material del tubo resonador del vibráfono: Aluminio; Latón; Acero; Otro
it: Materiale del tubi risonatori del vibrafono: Alluminio; Ottone; Acciaio; Altro
pt-BR: Vibrafone material dos tubos ressonadores: Alumínio; Latão; Aço; Outro
el: Υλικό σωλήνων αντήχησης βιμπραφώνου: Αλουμίνιο; Ορείχαλκος; Ατσάλι; Άλλο
ru: Материал резонаторных труб вибрафона: Алюминий; Латунь; Сталь; Другое
pl: Materiał rur rezonatorowych wibrafonu: Aluminium; Mosiądz; Stal; Inne
sl-SI: Material resonančnih cevi vibrafona: Aluminij; Medenina; Jeklo; Drugo
hu: Vibrafon-rezonátorcső anyaga: Alumínium; Sárgaréz; Acél; Egyéb
ro-RO: Materialul tubului rezonator al vibrafonului: Aluminiu; Alamă; Oțel; Altele